District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.15

Waiver of compensation.

An individual officer or employee of the District of Columbia government entitled to compensation under this subchapter may decline to accept all or any part of such compensation by a waiver signed and filed with the Director of Personnel. The waiver may be revoked in writing at any time. Payment of the compensation waived may not be made for the period during which the waiver was in effect.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1116
as added Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-130, § 2(g), 28 DCR 277
1981 Ed., § 1-612.15.
This section is referenced in § 47-1803.03.
Gross income, deductions, see § 47-1803.03.